Wisconsin, session 2025, SB594.
do enact as follows:SB594,11Section 1. 5.01 (4) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB594,3,425.01 (4) (a) If Except as provided under s. 7.62, if 2 or more candidates for the 3same office receive the greatest, but an equal number of votes, the winner shall be 4chosen by lot in the presence of the board of canvassers charged with the 1responsibility to determine the election, or in the case of an election for state or 2national office or metropolitan sewerage commissioner, if the commissioner is 3elected under s. 200.09 (11) (am), in the presence of the chairperson of the elections 4commission or the chairperson’s designee.SB594,25Section 2. 5.01 (4) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB594,3,965.01 (4) (b) If Except as provided under s. 7.62, if, in a primary, 2 or more 7candidates receive an equal but not the greatest number of votes so that only one of 8those candidates with equal votes may advance to the final election, the choice shall 9similarly be made by drawing lots.SB594,310Section 3. 5.01 (4) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB594,3,14115.01 (4) (c) The For purposes of pars. (a) and (b), the candidates may, if all 12those tied for the same office are present, draw for themselves. Upon refusal or 13absence of any of the candidates, the board of canvassers shall appoint a competent 14person to draw, and upon the results declare and certify the winner.SB594,415Section 4. 5.05 (1) (g) of the statutes is created to read:SB594,3,19165.05 (1) (g) Make grants to local governmental units, as defined in s. 5.20 (1) 17(a), to update equipment and software, including the implementation of secure 18technologies, to administer ranked-choice voting under s. 5.20 and the canvass 19procedure for ranked-choice voting under s. 7.62.SB594,520Section 5. 5.20 of the statutes is created to read:SB594,3,21215.20 Ranked-choice voting. (1) In this section:SB594,3,2322(a) “Local governmental unit” means a county, city, village, town, or special 23purpose district, including a school district.SB594,4,41(b) “Ranked-choice voting” means a voting method in which the electors voting 2in an election for an elective office are permitted to indicate and order their 3preferences for all candidates whose names appear on the ballot for the same office 4or seat.SB594,4,175(2) Except as provided in ss. 8.05 (1) (L) and 9.10 (3) (d) and (e) and (4) (f), the 6governing body of a local governmental unit may enact an ordinance or adopt a 7resolution to use ranked-choice voting for all elective offices to be filled in the local 8governmental unit. A governing body that enacts an ordinance or adopts a 9resolution to use ranked-choice voting shall notify the commission that it has taken 10such action no later than 120 days prior to the first election at which it intends to 11use ranked-choice voting. No governing body that adopts ranked-choice voting shall 12hold primaries for elective offices to be filled in the local governmental unit. A 13governing body that adopts ranked-choice voting shall use ranked-choice voting for 14all elective offices to be filled in the local governmental unit until such time as the 15ordinance or resolution is repealed. A governing body shall notify the commission of 16such a repeal no later than 120 days prior to the first election at which ranked-17choice voting will no longer be used.SB594,5,318(3) An elector may rank as many preferences for each office as there are 19candidates for the office whose names appear on the ballot. If more than one seat 20on a governing body is to be filled at large, the procedure under s. 7.62 (3) applies. 21If write-in votes are permitted, an elector may vote for a write-in candidate in 22addition to any candidate whose name appears on the ballot. To indicate a 23preference, an elector shall mark his or her ballot with or cause the voting machine 1to indicate the elector’s 1st choice, 2nd choice, and 3rd choice and subsequent 2choices, if any. An elector is not required to indicate a choice and is not required to 3indicate as many choices as the elector is eligible to indicate.SB594,64Section 6. 6.80 (2) (g) of the statutes is created to read:SB594,5,1656.80 (2) (g) In elections for offices or seats on a governing body at which 6ranked-choice voting under s. 5.20 is used, an elector may rank as many preferences 7for each office or seat as there are candidates whose names appear on the ballot for 8that office or seat. If more than one office or one seat on a governing body is to be 9filled at large, an elector may rank as many preferences for that office or seat as 10there are candidates whose names appear on the ballot for all of the offices or seats 11to be filled. If write-in votes are permitted, an elector may vote for a write-in 12candidate in addition to any candidate whose name appears on the ballot. An 13elector who indicates preferences for candidates for an office or seat shall indicate a 14different preference for each candidate for that office or seat. If an elector casts 15more than one vote for any office or seat without indicating preferences, the 16elector’s intent shall be determined as provided under s. 7.62 (4).SB594,717Section 7. 7.08 (1) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB594,5,22187.08 (1) (c) Prescribe forms required by ss. 6.24 (3) and (4), 6.30 (4) and (5), 196.33 (1), 6.47 (1) (am) 2. and (3), 6.55 (2), and 6.86 (2) to (3), and 7.62 (1m). All such 20forms shall contain a statement of the penalty applicable to false or fraudulent 21registration or voting through use of the form. Forms are not required to be 22furnished by the commission.SB594,823Section 8. 7.50 (1) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB594,6,717.50 (1) (b) When an elector casts more votes for any office or measure than he 2or she is entitled to cast at an election, all the elector’s votes for that office or 3measure are invalid and the elector is deemed to have voted for none of them, except 4as provided in par. (c) and sub. (2) (d) and s. 7.62. If an elector casts less votes for 5any office or measure than he or she is entitled to cast at an election, all votes cast 6by the elector shall be counted but no vote shall be counted more than once, except 7as provided in s. 7.62.SB594,98Section 9. 7.50 (1) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB594,6,1197.50 (1) (c) If an elector casts more than one vote for the same candidate for 10the same office, the first vote is valid and the remaining votes are invalid, except as 11provided in s. 7.62.SB594,1012Section 10. 7.50 (2) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB594,6,18137.50 (2) Ascertainment of intent. (intro.) All ballots cast at an election 14which bear the initials of 2 inspectors shall be counted for the person or referendum 15question for whom or for which they were intended, so far as the electors’ intent can 16be ascertained from the ballots notwithstanding informality or failure to fully 17comply with other provisions of chs. 5 to 12. To Except as otherwise provided under 18s. 7.62, to determine intent:SB594,1119Section 11. 7.51 (4) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB594,7,14207.51 (4) (a) The tally sheets shall state the total number of votes cast for each 21office and for each individual receiving votes for that office, whether or not the 22individual’s name appears on the ballot, and shall state the vote for and against 23each proposition voted on. For elections conducted under s. 5.20, the tally sheets 1shall also, for each round of tabulation, state the total number of highest-ranked 2preferences received by each candidate and the total number of lesser-ranked 3preferences received by each candidate, indicating the total number for each 4preference. Upon completion of the tally sheets, the inspectors shall immediately 5complete the inspectors’ statement. The inspectors shall state the excess, if any, by 6which the number of ballots exceeds the number of electors voting as shown by the 7poll list and shall state the number of the last elector as shown by the poll lists. At 8least 3 inspectors, including the chief inspector and, unless election officials are 9appointed under s. 7.30 (4) (c) without regard to party affiliation, at least one 10inspector representing each political party, but not including any inspector 11appointed under s. 7.30 (1) (b), shall then certify to the correctness of the statement 12and tally sheets and sign their names. All other election officials assisting with the 13tally shall also certify to the correctness of the tally sheets. When the tally is 14complete, the inspectors shall publicly announce the results from the statement.SB594,1215Section 12. 7.51 (5) (a) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:SB594,7,21167.51 (5) (a) 3. The inspectors shall also seal the inspectors’ statement, inside 17a separate carrier envelope, and shall similarly seal in a separate carrier envelope 18one tally sheet and one poll list for delivery to the municipal clerk. For elections 19conducted under s. 5.20, the inspectors shall enclose the tally sheet provided under 20s. 7.62 (1m). For school district elections, except in 1st class cities, the inspectors 21shall seal one tally sheet and one poll list for delivery to the school district clerk.SB594,1322Section 13. 7.53 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB594,9,10237.53 (1) (a) Where the municipality constitutes one ward or combines all 1wards to utilize a single polling place under s. 5.15 (6) (b), the canvass of the votes 2cast at the polling place shall be conducted publicly under s. 7.51 and the 3inspectors, other than any inspector appointed under s. 7.30 (1) (b), shall act as the 4municipal board of canvassers. The inspectors shall then complete the return 5statement for all votes cast at the polling place. If there are no provisional ballots 6that are eligible to be counted under s. 6.97 and no absentee ballots are being 7canvassed under s. 7.52, the inspectors may complete and sign the canvass 8statement and determination on election night. In municipalities where absentee 9ballots are canvassed under s. 7.52, after the canvass of the absentee ballots is 10completed under s. 7.52, the board of absentee ballot canvassers shall reconcile the 11poll list of the electors who vote by absentee ballot with the corresponding poll list of 12the electors who vote in person to ensure that no elector is allowed to cast more than 13one ballot. If an elector who votes in person has submitted an absentee ballot, the 14absentee ballot is void. Except as authorized in par. (b), if one or more electors of 15the municipality have cast provisional ballots that are eligible to be counted under 16s. 6.97, the inspectors, acting as the board of canvassers, shall reconvene no later 17than 9 a.m. on the Monday after the election to count the valid provisional ballots 18and shall adjust the returns accordingly. The inspectors, acting as the board of 19canvassers, need not reconvene if the municipal clerk certifies that he or she has 20received no provisional ballots from the time that the board of canvassers completed 21the initial canvass and 4 p.m. on the Friday after the election. Upon completion of 22the canvass under this paragraph and any canvass that is conducted under s. 7.52 23or 7.62 and ascertainment of the results by the inspectors or, in municipalities 1where absentee ballots are canvassed under s. 7.52, by the inspectors and the board 2of absentee ballot canvassers, the municipal clerk shall publicly read to the 3inspectors or the board of absentee ballot canvassers the names of the persons voted 4for and the number of votes for each person for each municipal office,; for elections 5conducted under s. 5.20, the number of highest-ranked preferences and the number 6of lesser-ranked preferences for each person for each office, indicating the numbers 7for each preference; the names of the persons declared by the inspectors or board of 8absentee ballot canvassers to have won nomination or election to each municipal 9office,; and the number of votes cast for and against each municipal referendum 10question.SB594,1411Section 14. 7.60 (4) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB594,9,23127.60 (4) (a) The board of canvassers shall make separate duplicate statements 13showing the numbers of votes cast for the offices of president and vice president; 14state officials; U.S. senators and representatives in congress; state legislators; 15justice; court of appeals judge; circuit judges; district attorneys; and metropolitan 16sewerage commissioners, if the commissioners are elected under s. 200.09 (11) (am). 17If a municipal judge elected under s. 755.01 (4) serves a municipality that is located 18partially within the county and candidates for that judgeship file nomination 19papers in another county, the board of canvassers shall prepare a duplicate 20statement showing the numbers of votes cast for that judgeship in that county for 21transmittal to the other county. For partisan candidates, the statements shall 22include the political party or principle designation, if any, next to the name of each 23candidate. The board of canvassers shall also prepare a statement showing the 1results of any county, technical college district, or statewide referendum. Each 2statement shall state the total number of votes cast in the county for each office; the 3names of all persons for whom the votes were cast, as returned; the number of votes 4cast for each person; for elections conducted under s. 5.20, the number of highest-5ranked preferences and lesser-ranked preferences cast for each person, indicating 6the numbers for each preference; and the number of votes cast for and against any 7question submitted at a referendum. The board of canvassers shall use one copy of 8each duplicate statement to report to the elections commission, technical college 9district board, or board of canvassers of any other county and shall file the other 10statement in the office of the county clerk or board of election commissioners.SB594,1511Section 15. 7.60 (4) (c) of the statutes is renumbered 7.60 (4) (c) (intro.) and 12amended to read:SB594,10,19137.60 (4) (c) (intro.) In preparing the statements and determinations, the board 14of canvassers shall carefully review the tally sheets and inspectors’ statement. The 15board of canvassers may omit the names of individuals whose names do not appear 16on the ballot and who receive a comparatively small number of votes. The board of 17canvassers shall designate votes received by such individuals as scattering votes. 18The board of canvassers shall append the following to each statement and 19determination a :SB594,10,22201. A tabulation of the votes cast at each election district, ward, or combination 21of wards authorized under s. 5.15 (6) (b) in the county for each office and each 22individual, whether the votes are canvassed or not, as well as the.SB594,11,2232. The total canvassed votes cast for each individual and each office, except 1where scattering votes are designated. If any votes are rejected, the board of 2canvassers shall specify the reasons therefor.SB594,163Section 16. 7.60 (4) (c) 3. of the statutes is created to read:SB594,11,647.60 (4) (c) 3. After elections at which ranked-choice voting under s. 5.20 is 5used, the number of highest-ranked preferences and lesser-ranked preferences for 6each person for each office, indicating the numbers for each preference.SB594,177Section 17. 7.60 (4) (c) 4. of the statutes is created to read:SB594,11,987.60 (4) (c) 4. For each rejected vote, the explanation by the board of 9canvassers for rejecting the vote.SB594,1810Section 18. 7.62 of the statutes is created to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb594 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb594 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB594 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB594 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB594: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting